en: Without ingredients derived from petroleum
ar: بدون مكونات مشتقة من البترول
az: Neftdən əldə edilən inqrediyentlər olmadan
bg: Без съставки, получени от нефт
bn: পেট্রোলিয়াম থেকে উদ্ভূত উপাদান ছাড়া
cs: Bez složek pocházejících z ropy
da: Uden ingredienser udvundet af petroleum
de: Ohne Inhaltsstoffe aus Erdöl
el: Χωρίς συστατικά που προέρχονται από πετρέλαιο
es: Sin ingredientes derivados del petróleo
et: Ilma naftast saadud koostisosadeta
fa: بدون مواد مشتق شده از نفت
fi: Ilman öljystä johdettuja ainesosia
fr: Sans ingredients issus du pétrole, sans derive du pétrole
ga: Gan comhábhair a dhíorthaítear ó pheitriliam
gu: પેટ્રોલિયમમાંથી મેળવેલા ઘટકો વગર
he: ללא רכיבים שמקורם מנפט
hr: Bez sastojaka dobivenih iz nafte
hu: Kőolajból származó összetevők nélkül
id: Tanpa bahan yang berasal dari petroleum
is: Án innihaldsefna unnin úr jarðolíu
it: Senza ingredienti derivati ​​dal petrolio
ja: 石油由来の成分は含まれていません
ka: ნავთობიდან მიღებული ინგრედიენტების გარეშე
kk: Мұнайдан алынған ингредиенттерсіз
km: គ្មានគ្រឿងផ្សំដែលបានមកពីប្រេងកាត
kn: ಪೆಟ್ರೋಲಿಯಂನಿಂದ ಪಡೆದ ಪದಾರ್ಥಗಳಿಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 석유에서 추출한 성분 없음
ky: Нефтьден алынган ингредиенттерсиз
lt: Be ingredientų, gautų iš naftos
lv: Bez sastāvdaļām, kas iegūtas no naftas
ml: പെട്രോളിയത്തിൽ നിന്ന് ഉത്പാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ചേരുവകൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Нефть боловсруулсан орцгүй
mr: पेट्रोलियमपासून बनवलेल्या घटकांशिवाय
ms: Tanpa bahan yang diperoleh daripada petroleum
mt: Mingħajr ingredjenti derivati miż-żejt
ne: पेट्रोलियमबाट प्राप्त सामग्रीहरू बिना
nl: Zonder ingrediënten afkomstig van aardolie
no: Uten ingredienser utvunnet av petroleum
or: ପେଟ୍ରୋଲିୟମରୁ ଉତ୍ପାଦିତ ଉପାଦାନ ବିନା
pa: ਪੈਟਰੋਲੀਅਮ ਤੋਂ ਪ੍ਰਾਪਤ ਕੀਤੀ ਸਮੱਗਰੀ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez składników pochodzących z ropy naftowej
pt: Sem ingredientes derivados de petróleo
ro: Fără ingrediente derivate din petrol
ru: Без ингредиентов, полученных из нефти
si: ඛනිජ තෙල් වලින් ලබාගත් අමුද්‍රව්‍ය නොමැත
sk: Bez zložiek získaných z ropy
sl: Brez sestavin, pridobljenih iz nafte
sq: Pa përbërës të nxjerrë nga nafta
sr: Bez sastojaka dobijenih od nafte
sv: Inga ingredienser från petroleum
sw: Bila viambato vinavyotokana na petroli
ta: பெட்ரோலியத்திலிருந்து பெறப்பட்ட பொருட்கள் இல்லாமல்
te: పెట్రోలియం నుండి పొందిన పదార్థాలు లేకుండా
tg: Бе компонентҳои аз нафт гирифташуда
th: ไม่มีส่วนผสมที่ได้จากปิโตรเลียม
tk: Nebitden alnan ingredientler bolmazdan
tl: Walang sangkap na nagmula sa petrolyo
tr: Petrol türevi içerik olmadan
uk: Без інгредієнтів, отриманих з нафти
uz: Neftdan olingan ingredientlarsiz
vi: Không có thành phần có nguồn gốc từ dầu mỏ

en: Without microplastics, Microplastic free, No microplastics
de: Ohne Mikroplastik
es: Sin microplásticos
fr: Sans microplastiques
it: Senza microplastiche
ja: マイクロプラスチックフリー
ko: 미세 플라스틱 없음
nl: Zonder microplastics
pt: Sem microplásticos

en: Without plastic microbeads
ar: بدون حبيبات بلاستيكية دقيقة
az: Plastik mikroşarlarsız
bg: Без пластмасови микрочастици
bn: প্লাস্টিকের মাইক্রোবিড ছাড়া
cs: Bez plastových mikročástic
da: Uden plastikmikroperler
de: Ohne Plastik-Mikroperlen
el: Χωρίς πλαστικά μικροσφαιρίδια
es: Sin microesferas de plástico
et: Ilma plastmassist mikrohelmesteta
fa: بدون میکروبیدهای پلاستیکی
fi: Ilman muovisia mikromuoveja
fr: sans-microbilles-de-plastique, sans-mirobilles-de-plastique, sans-micro-billes-de-plastique, formule-sans-microplastique
ga: Gan micrea-bhealaí plaisteacha
gu: પ્લાસ્ટિક માઇક્રોબીડ્સ વિના
he: ללא מיקרו-חרוזי פלסטיק
hr: Bez plastičnih mikrogranula
hu: Műanyag mikrogömbök nélkül
id: Tanpa mikroba plastik
is: Án plastíks örsmár
ja: プラスチックマイクロビーズ不使用
ka: პლასტმასის მიკრომარცვლების გარეშე
kk: Пластик микросферасыз
km: គ្មានមីក្រូប៊ីតប្លាស្ទិក
kn: ಪ್ಲಾಸ್ಟಿಕ್ ಮೈಕ್ರೋಬೀಡ್ಸ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 플라스틱 마이크로비드 없음
ky: Пластик микросфералары жок
lt: Be plastikinių mikrogranulių
lv: Bez plastmasas mikrodaļiņām
ml: പ്ലാസ്റ്റിക് മൈക്രോബീഡുകൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Хуванцар бичил бөмбөлөггүй
mr: प्लास्टिक मायक्रोबीड्सशिवाय
ms: Tanpa manik mikro plastik
mt: Mingħajr mikrożibeġ tal-plastik
ne: प्लास्टिक माइक्रोबीड्स बिना
nl: Zonder plastic microbolletjes
no: Uten plastmikroperler
or: ପ୍ଲାଷ୍ଟିକ୍ ମାଇକ୍ରୋବିଡ୍ସ ବିନା
pa: ਪਲਾਸਟਿਕ ਮਾਈਕ੍ਰੋਬੀਡ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez plastikowych mikrogranulek
pt: Sem microesferas de plástico
ro: Fără microbile de plastic
ru: Без пластиковых микрогранул
si: ප්ලාස්ටික් ක්ෂුද්‍ර පබළු රහිත
sk: Bez plastových mikročastíc
sl: Brez plastičnih mikrodelcev
sq: Pa mikrorruaza plastike
sr: Bez plastičnih mikrogranula
sv: Utan plastmikroplaster
sw: Bila chembechembe za plastiki
ta: பிளாஸ்டிக் மைக்ரோபீட்ஸ் இல்லாமல்
te: ప్లాస్టిక్ మైక్రోబీడ్స్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе микрогранулҳои пластикӣ
th: ไม่มีไมโครบีดพลาสติก
tk: Plastik mikrobölejikleri ýok
tl: Walang mga plastic microbeads
tr: Plastik mikro boncuksuz
uk: Без пластикових мікрогранул
uz: Plastik mikroburchaklarsiz
vi: Không có hạt vi nhựa

en: Without binder
fr: Sans agent liant

en: Ophthalmologically tested, Ophthalmologist tested
de: Augenärztlich getestet
es: Oftalmológicamente probado, Probado oftalmológicamente
fr: Testé ophtalmologiquement
it: Testato oftalmologicamente
ja: 眼科医によるテスト済み
ko: 안과 의사 테스트 완료
nl: Oftalmologisch getest
pt: Testado oftalmologicamente

en: Tested under ophthalmological control
de: Unter augenärztlicher Kontrolle getestet
es: Testado bajo control oftalmológico
fr: Testé sous contrôle ophtalmologique
it: Testato sotto controllo oftalmologico
ja: 眼科医の管理下でテスト済み
ko: 안과 전문의의 관리하에 테스트됨
nl: Getest onder oogheelkundige controle
pt: Testado sob controle oftalmológico

en: Tested under gynecological control
ar: تم اختباره تحت إشراف أطباء النساء
az: Ginekoloq nəzarəti altında test edilmişdir
bg: Тестван под гинекологичен контрол
bn: স্ত্রীরোগ বিশেষজ্ঞের তত্ত্বাবধানে পরীক্ষিত
cs: Testováno pod gynekologickou kontrolou
da: Testet under gynækologisk kontrol
de: Unter gynäkologischer Kontrolle getestet
el: Δοκιμασμένο υπό γυναικολογικό έλεγχο
es: Testado bajo control ginecológico
et: Testitud günekoloogi järelevalve all
fa: تست شده تحت نظر متخصص زنان
fi: Testattu gynekologin valvonnassa
fr: Testé sous contrôle gynécologique
ga: Tástáladh faoi rialú gínéiceolaíoch
gu: સ્ત્રીરોગવિજ્ઞાની નિયંત્રણ હેઠળ પરીક્ષણ કરાયેલ
he: נבדק תחת פיקוח גינקולוגי
hr: Testirano pod ginekološkim nadzorom
hu: Nőgyógyászati ellenőrzés mellett tesztelve
id: Diuji di bawah pengawasan ginekologi
is: Prófað undir kvensjúkdómafræðilegu eftirliti
it: Testato sotto controllo ginecologico
ja: 婦人科医の管理下でテスト済み
ka: შემოწმებულია გინეკოლოგის კონტროლის ქვეშ
kk: Гинекологиялық бақылауда тексерілген
km: ត្រូវបានធ្វើតេស្តក្រោមការត្រួតពិនិត្យរោគស្ត្រី
kn: ಸ್ತ್ರೀರೋಗತಜ್ಞರ ನಿಯಂತ್ರಣದಲ್ಲಿ ಪರೀಕ್ಷಿಸಲಾಗಿದೆ
ko: 산부인과 전문의의 관리하에 테스트됨
ky: Гинекологдун көзөмөлүндө текшерилген
lt: Ištirta prižiūrint ginekologui
lv: Pārbaudīts ginekologa uzraudzībā
ml: ഗൈനക്കോളജിക്കൽ നിയന്ത്രണത്തിൽ പരീക്ഷിച്ചു
mn: Эмэгтэйчүүдийн эмчийн хяналтан дор туршигдсан
mr: स्त्रीरोगतज्ज्ञांच्या नियंत्रणाखाली चाचणी केली जाते
ms: Diuji di bawah kawalan ginekologi
mt: Ittestjat taħt kontroll ġinekoloġiku
ne: स्त्री रोग विशेषज्ञको नियन्त्रणमा परीक्षण गरिएको
nl: Getest onder gynaecologische controle
no: Testet under gynekologisk kontroll
or: ସ୍ତ୍ରୀ ରୋଗ ବିଶେଷଜ୍ଞଙ୍କ ତତ୍ତ୍ଵାବଧାନରେ ପରୀକ୍ଷିତ
pa: ਗਾਇਨੀਕੋਲੋਜੀਕਲ ਨਿਯੰਤਰਣ ਅਧੀਨ ਟੈਸਟ ਕੀਤਾ ਗਿਆ
pl: Testowane pod kontrolą ginekologiczną
pt: Testado sob controle ginecológico
ro: Testat sub control ginecologic
ru: Протестировано под гинекологическим контролем
si: නාරිවේද පාලනය යටතේ පරීක්ෂා කරන ලදී
sk: Testované pod gynekologickou kontrolou
sl: Testirano pod ginekološkim nadzorom
sq: Testuar nën kontrollin gjinekologjik
sr: Testirano pod ginekološkom kontrolom
sv: Testad under gynekologisk kontroll
sw: Imejaribiwa chini ya udhibiti wa gynecological
ta: பெண்ணோயியல் கட்டுப்பாட்டின் கீழ் சோதனை செய்யப்பட்டது
te: గైనకాలజీ నియంత్రణలో పరీక్షించబడింది
tg: Таҳти назорати гинекологӣ санҷида шудааст
th: ทดสอบภายใต้การควบคุมทางนรีเวชวิทยา
tk: Ginekolog gözegçiliginde synagdan geçirilen
tl: Nasubukan sa ilalim ng kontrol ng gynecological
tr: Jinekolojik kontrol altında test edilmiştir
uk: Перевірено під гінекологічним контролем
uz: Ginekologik nazorat ostida sinovdan o'tgan
vi: Đã kiểm nghiệm dưới sự kiểm soát của bác sĩ phụ khoa

en: Gynecologically tested
de: Gynäkologisch getestet
es: Ginecológicamente probado
it: Testato ginecologicamente
ja: 婦人科医によるテスト済み
ko: 산부인과 전문의 테스트 완료
nl: Gynaecologisch getest
pt: Testado ginecologicamente

en: Clinically tested
de: Klinisch getestet
es: Clínicamente probado
fr: Testé cliniquement
it: Clinicamente testato
ja: 臨床的にテスト済み
ko: 임상적으로 테스트됨
nl: Klinisch getest
pt: Testado clinicamente

en: Without essential oil
ar: بدون زيت عطري
az: Efir yağı olmadan
bg: Без етерично масло
bn: অপরিহার্য তেল ছাড়া
cs: Bez esenciálního oleje
da: Uden æterisk olie
de: Ohne ätherisches Öl
el: Χωρίς αιθέριο έλαιο
es: Sin aceite esencial
et: Ilma eeterliku õlita
fa: بدون روغن اساسی
fi: Ilman eteeristä öljyä
fr: Sans huile essentielle
ga: Gan ola riachtanach
gu: આવશ્યક તેલ વગર
he: ללא שמן אתרי
hr: Bez eteričnog ulja
hu: Illóolaj nélkül
id: Tanpa minyak esensial
is: Án ilmkjarnaolíu
it: Senza olio essenziale
ja: エッセンシャルオイル不使用
ka: ეთერზეთის გარეშე
kk: Эфир майынсыз
km: គ្មានប្រេងសំខាន់ៗ
kn: ಸಾರಭೂತ ತೈಲವಿಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 에센셜 오일 없음
ky: Эфир майы жок
lt: Be eterinio aliejaus
lv: Bez ēteriskās eļļas
ml: എസ്സെൻഷ്യൽ ഓയിൽ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Чухал тосгүй
mr: आवश्यक तेलाशिवाय
ms: Tanpa minyak pati
mt: Mingħajr żejt essenzjali
ne: आवश्यक तेल बिना
nl: Zonder essentiële olie
no: Uten eterisk olje
or: ଅତ୍ୟାବଶ୍ୟକ ତେଲ ବିନା
pa: ਜ਼ਰੂਰੀ ਤੇਲ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez olejku eterycznego
pt: Sem óleo essencial
ro: Fără ulei esențial
ru: Без эфирного масла
si: සගන්ධ තෙල් රහිත
sk: Bez esenciálneho oleja
sl: Brez eteričnega olja
sq: Pa vaj esencial
sr: Bez eteričnog ulja
sv: Utan eterisk olja
sw: Bila mafuta muhimu
ta: அத்தியாவசிய எண்ணெய் இல்லாமல்
te: ముఖ్యమైన నూనె లేకుండా
tg: Бе равғани эфирӣ
th: ไม่มีน้ำมันหอมระเหย
tk: Efir ýagy bolmazdan
tl: Walang mahahalagang langis
tr: Esansiyel yağsız
uk: Без ефірної олії
uz: Efir moyisiz
vi: Không có tinh dầu

en: Without menthol
fr: Sans menthol

en: Without mint
fr: Sans menthe

en: Without lotion
fr: Sans lotion

en: Without ionization
fr: Sans ionisation

fr: Ne pique pas les yeux
en: Does not sting the eyes, No more tears, No tears, No tears formula
de: Brennt nicht in den Augen, Keine Tränen, Tränenfrei, Keine Tränen-Formel
es: No irrita los ojos, Sin lágrimas, Fórmula sin lágrimas
nl: Prikt niet in de ogen, Geen tranen, Geen tranen formule

fr: Non comédogène, Non obstruant les pores
en: Non comedogenic, Non pore-clogging
de: Nicht komedogen, Nicht porenverstopfend
es: No comedogénico, No obstruye los poros
it: Non comedogenico, Non ostruisce i pori
ja: ノンコメドジェニック、毛穴を詰まらせない
ko: 논코메도제닉, 모공을 막지 않음
pt: Nao comedogenico

en: Waterproof, splashproof, water resistant
ar: ضد للماء, مقاوم للرذاذ, مقاوم للمياه
az: Su keçirməz, sıçrayışa davamlı, suya davamlı
bg: Водоустойчив, устойчив на пръски, водоустойчив
bn: জলরোধী, স্প্ল্যাশপ্রুফ, জল প্রতিরোধী
cs: Voděodolný, odolný proti stříkající vodě, voděodolný
da: Vandtæt, stænktæt, vandafvisende
de: Wasserdicht, spritzwassergeschützt, wasserfest
el: Αδιάβροχο, ανθεκτικό στο πιτσίλισμα, αδιάβροχο
es: Resistente al agua, a prueba de salpicaduras, resistente al agua
et: Veekindel, pritsmekindel, veekindel
fa: ضد آب, مقاوم در برابر پاشش, مقاوم در برابر آب
fi: Vedenpitävä, roisketiivis, vettähylkivä
fr: Résiste à l'eau, Résistant à l'eau
ga: Uiscedhíonach, splancdhíonach, uisce-resistant
gu: વોટરપ્રૂફ, સ્પ્લેશપ્રૂફ, વોટર રેઝિસ્ટન્ટ
he: עמיד במים, עמיד בפני התזה, עמיד במים
hr: Vodootporan, otporan na prskanje, vodootporan
hu: Vízálló, cseppálló, vízálló
id: Tahan air, tahan percikan, tahan air
is: Vatnsheldur, skvettaþolinn, vatnsheldur
it: Impermeabile, resistente agli spruzzi, resistente all'acqua
ja: 防水, 防滴, 耐水性
ka: წყალგაუმტარი, შხეფებისგან დამცავი, წყალგამძლე
kk: Су өткізбейтін, шашырауға төзімді, суға төзімді
km: មិនជ្រាបទឹក, ធន់នឹងការខ្ទាត, ធន់នឹងទឹក
kn: ಜಲನಿರೋಧಕ, ಸ್ಪ್ಲಾಶ್‌ಪ್ರೂಫ್, ವಾಟರ್ ರೆಸಿಸ್ಟೆಂಟ್
ko: 방수, 생활 방수, 내수성
ky: Суу өткөрбөйт, чачырандыга чыдамдуу, сууга чыдамдуу
lt: Atsparus vandeniui, atsparus purslams, atsparus vandeniui
lv: Ūdensizturīgs, noturīgs pret šļakatām, ūdensizturīgs
ml: വാട്ടർപ്രൂഫ്, സ്പ്ലാഷ് പ്രൂഫ്, വാട്ടർ റെസിസ്റ്റന്റ്
mn: Усны хамгаалалттай, цацралын хамгаалалттай, усны хамгаалалттай
mr: जलरोधक, स्प्लॅशप्रूफ, जलरोधक
ms: Kalis air, kalis percikan, kalis air
mt: Ma jgħaddix ilma, reżistenti għat-titjir, reżistenti għall-ilma
ne: वाटरप्रूफ, स्प्ल्याशप्रूफ, पानी प्रतिरोधी
nl: Waterdicht, spatwaterdicht, waterbestendig
no: Vanntett, sprutsikker, vannavstøtende
or: ଜଳରୋଧୀ, ସ୍ପ୍ଲାସ୍ ପ୍ରୁଫ୍, ଜଳ ପ୍ରତିରୋଧକ
pa: ਵਾਟਰਪ੍ਰੂਫ਼, ਸਪਲੈਸ਼ਪਰੂਫ਼, ਵਾਟਰ ਰੈਜ਼ਿਸਟੈਂਟ
pl: Wodoodporny, odporny na zachlapania, wodoodporny
pt: À prova de água, à prova de salpicos, resistente à água
ro: Impermeabil, rezistent la stropi, rezistent la apă
ru: Водонепроницаемый, брызгозащищенный, водостойкий
si: ජල ආරක්ෂිත, විසිරීම් ආරක්ෂිත, ජල ප්රතිරෝධී
sk: Vodotesný, odolný voči striekajúcej vode, vodoodolný
sl: Vodoodporen, odporen proti brizganju, vodoodporen
sq: I papërshkueshëm nga uji, rezistent ndaj spërkatjeve, rezistent ndaj ujit
sr: Водоотпоран, отпоран на прскање, водоотпоран
sv: Vattentät, stänksäker, vattentålig, vattenresistent
sw: Haipitishi maji, haipitishi maji, hustahimili maji
ta: நீர்ப்புகா, தெறிக்காத, நீர் எதிர்ப்பு
te: నీటిని నిరోధించే, స్ప్లాష్ ప్రూఫ్, నీటి నిరోధకత
tg: Обногузар, ба пошидан тобовар, обногузар
th: กันน้ำ, กันน้ำกระเซ็น, ทนน้ำ
tk: Suw geçirmeýän, suw sepilmegine çydamly, suwa çydamly
tl: Hindi tinatagusan ng tubig, splashproof, water resistant
tr: Su geçirmez, sıçramaya dayanıklı, suya dayanıklı
uk: Водонепроникний, стійкий до бризок, водостійкий
uz: Suv o'tkazmaydigan, sachrashga chidamli, suvga chidamli
vi: Chống thấm nước, chống bắn tóe, chịu nước

en: Extra waterproof, Extra water resistant
sv: Extra vattenresistent